Maine, session 132, LD2031.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6601, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. EEEEE, §14,
is further amended to read:
5. License fee. Except as provided in subsection subsections 5‑A and 5-B, the fee for
a commercial shellfish license is $58.25.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6601, sub-§5-A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. EEEEE,
§15, is further amended to read:
5-A. Exception; age. The fee for a commercial shellfish license for applicants 70
years of age or older and applicants under 18 years of age is $67, which must be deposited
in the Shellfish Fund established under section 6651.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6601, sub-§5-B is enacted to read:
5-B. Exception; veterans. The department shall offer a 50% discount on the
applicable license fee required under subsection 5 or 5-A to an applicant who is a veteran
of the United States Armed Forces and who was honorably discharged.
Sec. 4. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.